Idaho, session 2025, H0056.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-5711C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5711C. CONSTRUCTION OF PUBLIC PROJECTS -- COMPETITIVE SEALED BID-
DING. (1) All construction contracts for public works shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible and responsive bidder, subject to the provisions of sec-
tion 59-1015, Idaho Code, after receipt of competitive sealed bidding ex-
cept as otherwise provided in sections 67-5711B, 67-5711D and 67-5713, Idaho
Code.
(2) An invitation for bids shall be issued and shall include a project
description and all contractual terms and conditions applicable to the pub-
lic works.
(3) Adequate public notice of the invitation for bids shall be given at
least fourteen (14) days prior to the date set forth therein for the opening
of bids. Such notice shall include publication at least fourteen (14) days
prior to bid opening in a newspaper of general circulation in the area where
the work is located.
(4) When prequalification is deemed by the department and by the re-
spective state agency to be in the best interest of the state, competitive
bidding procedures shall be open only to licensed public works contractors
that meet preliminary supplemental qualifications. The solicitation for
bids in a prequalified bidder public works project shall consist of two
(2) stages: an initial stage for identifying prequalified contractors,
either prime or specialty contractors, followed by a stage during which
bid prices will be accepted only from prequalified contractors. Notice of
the prequalification stage shall be given in the same manner that notice of
open competitive bidding is provided. Prequalification standards must be
premised upon demonstrated technical competence, experience constructing
similar facilities, prior experience with the state, past performance re-
lated to quality, workmanship and timeliness, reliability, safety record,
available nonfinancial resources, equipment and personnel as they relate
to the subject project, and overall performance history based upon a con-
tractor's entire body of work. Any request for qualifications must include
the standards for evaluating the qualifications of prospective bidders.
Licensed contractors desiring to be prequalified to bid on a project must
submit a written response to a request for qualifications. After a review
of qualification submittals, licensed contractors that meet the prequali-
fication standards shall be so notified, and licensed contractors that do


not meet the prequalification standards shall also be so notified. There-
after, bids may be solicited from contractors that meet the prequalification
standards. The department may promulgate rules or develop procedures to
implement the prequalification process.
(5) Bids shall be opened publicly at the time and place designated in
the invitation for bids. The amount of each bid and such other relevant in-
formation as may be specified by rules, together with the name of each bid-
der, shall be entered on a record and the record shall be open to public in-
spection. After the time of the award, all bids and bid documents shall be
open to public inspection in accordance with the provisions of chapter 1, ti-
tle 74 and section 67-9215, Idaho Code.
(6) With respect to a project having a written cost estimate of
greater than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) fifty thousand dol-
lars ($50,000) but less than the public works limit established in section
67-5711, Idaho Code, the agency, if it does not perform the work with ex-
isting physical plant staff, must award a written contract to the lowest
responsible and responsive bidder after soliciting at least three (3) doc-
umented informal bids from contractors licensed in Idaho to perform public
works contracts, if reasonably available. Adequate public notice of the
invitation for informal bids shall be given at least seven (7) days prior to
the date set forth therein for the receipt of the informal bids. Such notice
may include publication at least seven (7) days prior to bid opening in a
newspaper of general circulation in the area where the work is located; or
the agency may advertise the invitation for bids in appropriate trade jour-
nals, and otherwise notify persons believed to be interested in the award
of a contract. Informal bids must be submitted by the contractor in writing
in response to a prepared written document describing the project's scope
of work in sufficient detail so as to enable a contractor familiar with such
work to prepare a responsible bid. Nothing herein exempts an agency from
the responsibility of utilizing formal plans and specifications if the work
involves the public health or safety as described in chapters 3 and 12, title
54, Idaho Code. The agency must document receipt of the informal bids in the
project file.
(7) Any personal property including goods, parts, supplies and equip-
ment that is to be supplied or provided by a state agency for use in any public
work, project, or preventive maintenance programs, whether the public work,
project, or preventive maintenance program is constructed, undertaken or
performed by agency in-house personnel, or by delegation pursuant to section
67-5710A, Idaho Code, or otherwise provided or supplied by the agency to a
contractor, the personal property, goods, parts, supplies or equipment sup-
plied or provided by the agency must be purchased or procured by the agency
through the division of purchasing in accordance with the Idaho Code.
(8) No bid submitted pursuant to this section shall be accepted or de-
nied based on environmental, social, and governance standards. For purposes
of this subsection, "environmental, social, and governance standards" means
procurement standards that screen or score bids, in whole or in part, on sub-
jective ethical or sustainability criteria unrelated to the specifications
in a solicitation or the qualifications of a bidder.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.